src/fst/stems/exceptions.lexc
!! Exceptions are quite strange word-forms. the ones that do not fit anywhere 
!! else. This file contains all enumerated word forms that cannot reasonably be
!! created from lexical data by regular inflection. Usually there should be next
!! to none exceptions, it's always better to have a paradigm that covers only
!! one or few words than an exception since these will not work nicely with e.g.
!! compounding scheme or possibly many end applications.

LEXICON Adposition
räjja PO_ ;
mieʹldd PO_ ;
diõtt PO_ ;
årra PO_ ;


!! !!!Skolt Saami adverbs

!LEXICON Adverb
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' contains adverbs.
!! They are taken from [http://www.uta.fi/~km56049/same/skolt/koltansaame.html]


!! !!!Skolt Saami Conjunctions 


LEXICON Conjunction  
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' lists the conjunction
leašša CC_ "but / mutta, vaan" ; ! WHAT IS THIS 2017-05-01



!! !!!Skolt Saami Interjections 


LEXICON ij         
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' gives the tag __+Interj__
+Interj: # ;           


LEXICON Interjection   
!! The lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' lists the interjections
ai ij ;            !!= * @CODE@
beâddaa ij "voi kauhistus" ;
nä ij "no" ;
no ij "no" ;
nu ij "no" ;
ne ij "no" ;
näʹde ij "no sitten" ;
oi ij "oi" ;
tiõrv ij "hei" ;
vot ij "no niin" ;
vuõi ij "voi" ;
vui ij "voi" ;
voi ij "voi" ;
oi ij "voi" ;





!! !!!Skolt Saami Particles


LEXICON Particle 
!! !!List of particles in the lexicon @LEXNAME@

ges PCLE_ ; !!= @CODE@

!! !!unclear whether these are really particles
joo PCLE_ ; !!from a song


!! !!!Propernoun lexicon, Skolt Sámi specific names 


!! !!!Subjunctions
